Hawaii statutes.
§46-13 Each county to determine its own
number of fire stations. Any other provisions of law to the contrary
notwithstanding, the council of each county, may determine the number of fire
stations it will establish and maintain within its respective county. [L 1962,
c 2, §2; Supp, §138-46; HRS §46-13]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next